Illinois, session 104th, SB1106.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and 5Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 180/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-437, eff. 1-1-18.)